Hawaii, session 2026, HB9.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii is home to multitudes of United States armed forces members and veterans who have made the choice to protect freedom and the nation. The legislature further finds that the Purple Heart, originally titled the Badge of Military Merit, was a purple-colored, heart-shaped badge created by General George Washington in 1782 and is the oldest military decoration in present use.  The medal was intended to recognize, as General Washington wrote on August 7, 1782, "any singularly meritorious action"--not only instances of unusual gallantry in battle but also extraordinary fidelity and essential service in any way. The legislature also finds that the Purple Heart is currently awarded to members of the United States armed forces who have been killed, been wounded, or died of wounds received while engaged in armed combat with an enemy force or as a result of international terrorism or being held as a prisoner of war. The legislature additionally finds that Hawaii has a proud history of supporting its active military and veteran population and deeply appreciates the sacrifices that its Purple Heart recipients have made in the nation's defense. Furthermore, the legislature finds that it is appropriate to honor the State's Purple Heart recipients for their singularly meritorious action in the line of duty and their service to the people of Hawaii and the nation. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to designate Hawaii as a Purple Heart state. SECTION 2.  Chapter 5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§5-     Purple Heart state; designation.  The State shall be known and designated as a Purple Heart state to recognize and honor the extraordinary courage, service, and sacrifices made in the line of duty by Hawaii's Purple Heart recipients." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________